Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF809.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [117.80] ACTUAL NOTICE REQUIRED; EASEMENTS. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a local, state, or any other government entity with an easement over private property must provide actual notice to an owner by mail, email, or telephone before using the easement. A municipality or state agency failing to provide actual notice under this section is subject to a civil penalty of $500 per violation. An owner aggrieved by a violation of this section may bring an action in district court to recover actual damages, any penalties under this section, costs, and reasonable attorney fees. new text end